Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.52.020

Burglary in the first degree.

(1) A person is guilty of burglary in the first degree if, with intent to commit a crime against a person or property therein, he or she enters or remains unlawfully in a building and if, in entering or while in the building or in immediate flight therefrom, the actor or another participant in the crime (a) is armed with a deadly weapon, or (b) assaults any person.

(2) Burglary in the first degree is a class A felony.

[ 1996 c 15 s 1; 1995 c 129 s 9 (Initiative Measure No. 159); 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.52.020.]

NOTES:

Findings and intent—Short title—Severability—Captions not law—1995 c 129: See notes following RCW 9.94A.510.